Arkansas, session 2025, HB1536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-19-130, concerning school bus passenger
restraint systems, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(g) If a school district does not place a proposal on the ballot for
the next school election under subsection (e) of this section or elect to
purchase, install, and maintain passenger restraint systems as specified in
subsection (f) of this section, then twenty-five percent (25%) of the state
transportation funding allocated to the school district shall be withheld
until the school district either places a proposal on the ballot for the next
school election or purchases, installs, and maintains passenger restraint
systems for all newly purchased school buses.

/s/M. McElroy
*TNL230*
03-17-2025 10:04:00 TNL230